Louisiana, session 2026, HB1131.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:193(A), 195(A), and 196(A)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 18:32, 33, 34, 202, and 203 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§32. Transmission of sensitive voter data to federal agencies; restrictions
A. The secretary of state shall not transmit sensitive voter data to any federal
agency unless required by federal law or court order or provided for in a written
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1372 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1131
intergovernmental agreement posted on the secretary of state's website for not less
than thirty days prior to transmission.
B.(1) At least thirty days prior to the transmission of sensitive voter data, the
secretary of state shall notify each affected voter by each of the following methods:
(a) First-class mail.
(b) Electronic mail, if an electronic mail address is available.
(c) Short message service message, if a short message service number is
available.
(d) Automated telephone notification, if a phone number is available.
(2) The notice shall include the following:
(a) The name of the receiving agency.
(b) The purpose of the data transmission.
(c) The categories of data to be transmitted.
(d) Information on how the voter may seek clarification or contest the
transmission if permitted by law.
C. If immediate transmission is required by court order or federal directive,
notice shall be provided within thirty days after transmission unless prohibited by the
court order or federal directive.
D. For purposes of this Section, "sensitive voter data" means personally
identifiable information contained within the state voter registration computer system
that is not publicly available under law, including but not limited to full or partial
social security numbers, driver's license numbers, dates of birth, residential addresses
where protected by law, contact information, and identifiable voting history.
§33. Voter status notification system
A. The secretary of state shall establish and maintain a statewide voter status
notification system which shall provide automated notification to a registered voter
of the following:
(1) Address confirmation requirements.
(2) Placement of his name on the inactive list of voters.
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1372 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1131
(3) Risk of cancellation of the voter's registration.
(4) Cancellation of the voter's registration.
B. The system shall provide automated notification to voters by each of the
following methods:
(1) First-class mail.
(2) Electronic mail, if an electronic mail address is available.
(3) Short message service message, if a short message service number is
available.
(4) Automated telephone notification, if a phone number is available.
C.(1) Initial notice shall be issued within five business days of any of the
events provided for in Subsection A of this Section.
(2) A second notice shall be issued within thirty days of any of the events
provided for in Subsection A of this Section.
(3) A third notice shall be issued not less than sixty days prior to
cancellation,
(4) A voter's registration shall not be cancelled unless at least ninety days
have elapsed from the date the initial notice was issued.
D. The secretary of state shall provide to voters simple instructions to update
or verify registration online, by mail, or in person.
§34. Louisiana Voter Data Transparency Task Force
A. There is hereby created the Louisiana Voter Data Transparency Task
Force within the Department of State.
B.(1) The task force shall be composed of the following members:
(a) The secretary of state or his designee.
(b) One member appointed by the governor.
(c) One member appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives.
(d) One member appointed by the president of the Senate.
(e) Two representatives of each recognized political party with over one
thousand registered voters, appointed by the party's state central committee.
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1372 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1131
(f) One nonpartisan representative appointed by the League of Women
Voters.
(g) One data privacy expert appointed by the American Civil Liberties Union
of Louisiana.
(h) One civil rights attorney appointed by the Power Coalition for Equity and
Justice.
(i) One parish registrar of voters appointed by the Louisiana Registrars of
Voters Association.
(2) The names of the persons who are to serve on the task force shall be
submitted to the secretary of state on or before September 1, 2026.
C.(1) The task force shall meet quarterly to review and discuss the following:
(a) Quarterly voter maintenance reports published pursuant to R.S. 18:203.
(b) Registration cancellation rates across gender, race, and party affiliation.
(c) Federal data-sharing agreements.
(2) The task force shall submit an annual report including its findings and
recommendations to the House Committee on House and Governmental Affairs and
Senate Committee on Senate and Governmental Affairs no later than February first
of each year.
D.(1) The secretary of state or his designee shall call an organizational
meeting of the task force no later than September 15, 2026. The task force shall elect
a chairman, and any other officers deemed necessary, from among the membership.
(2) A majority of the total membership shall constitute a quorum of the task
force, and any official action taken by the task force shall require an affirmative vote
of the majority of the quorum present and voting.
E. Members shall serve without compensation, except for per diem or
expenses to which they may be entitled as members of the constituent organizations.
F. The Department of State shall provide staff to support the task force.
* * *
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1372 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1131
§193. Challenge and cancellation of registration; notice; procedures
A. When the registrar has reason to believe that a registrant no longer is
qualified to be registered, or that a registrant has changed his residence, the registrar
shall immediately notify the person registrant by sending the address confirmation
notice to the registrant and place the voter on the inactive list of voters. A registrant
shall be placed on the inactive list of voters if he fails to respond to the address
confirmation notice within thirty days from the date the address confirmation notice
was sent to the registrant. However, a person registrant shall not be placed on the
inactive list of voters if there is address information available to the registrar from
the United States Postal Service or its licensee which indicates the voter registrant
has moved to another address within the parish.
* * *
§195. Challenge of registrants in the United States Service or temporarily residing
outside United States
A. If the registrant whose registration is challenged for any lawful cause is
a member of the United States Service or is a person who is temporarily residing
outside of the territorial limits of the United States, the registrar shall mail the
registrant an address confirmation notice. The registrant's name shall be placed on
the inactive list of voters upon mailing of such notice as provided in R.S. 18:193.
* * *
§196. Inactive list of voters; procedure for voting
A.(1) In addition to the official list of voters, there shall be an inactive list
of voters which shall consist of registrants who have been mailed an address
confirmation notice and failed to respond to the notice within thirty days from the
date the address confirmation notice was sent to the registrant. The names of
registrants on the inactive list of voters shall not be counted in computing the number
of ballots required for an election, the number of voters required to divide or
constitute a precinct, the number of signatures required on any petition, the number
of commissioners at a precinct pursuant to R.S. 18:425, the number of voting
machines to be allocated and used in each voting precinct pursuant to R.S. 18:1363,
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1372 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1131
or the number of registered voters necessary to recognize or determine the
organization of a political party or committee.
* * *
§202. Voter list maintenance; limitations
A.(1) Voter list maintenance as provided for in this Part, including the
annual canvass and the challenge and cancellation of voter registration, shall be
conducted in a uniform, nondiscriminatory manner consistent with state and federal
law.
(2) No registrant's registration shall be cancelled and no registrant shall be
placed on the inactive list of voters solely for failure to vote in any election or for
any period of inactivity.
(3) No registrant shall be identified for cancellation and no registrant shall
be placed on the inactive list of voters based upon political party affiliation, change
in party affiliation, or non-affiliation.
(4) Criteria for voter list maintenance shall be applied equally to all
recognized political parties and affiliated voters.
B. No systematic voter registration removal program shall be conducted
within ninety days of a fall election.
C. The legislative auditor shall conduct annual compliance audits of voter
list maintenance procedures as provided in this Part and report his findings to the
legislature.
§203. Voter list maintenance reporting requirements
A. The secretary of state shall publish quarterly reports including the
following information:
(1) Total number of registered voters.
(2) Total number voters on the inactive list of voters.
(3) Total number of voters whose registration was cancelled during the
reporting period.
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1372 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1131
(4) Total number of voters whose registration was cancelled during the
reporting period, categorized by the following:
(a) Parish.
(b) Reason for cancellation.
(c) Party affiliation, including unaffiliated registrants.
(d) Gender.
(e) Race.
B. Each report required by this Section shall be published on the official
website of the secretary of state in a searchable format.
Section 2. R.S. 24:513(D)(9) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§513. Powers and duties of legislative auditor; audit reports as public records;
assistance and opinions of attorney general; frequency of audits; subpoena
power
* * *
D. In addition, the legislative auditor shall perform the following duties and
functions:
* * *
(9) Conduct an annual compliance audit of voter list maintenance procedures
as provided in R.S. 18:202 and report his findings to the legislature.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 18:192(B) is hereby repealed in its entirety.